Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1905
Depositions; how taken.

The proceedings in taking the examination of such witness and returning it to court shall be governed in all respects as the taking of depositions in all civil cases.

G.S.1873, c. 58, § 463, p. 825;

R.S.1913, § 9103;

C.S.1922, § 10128;

C.S.1929, § 29-1905;

R.S.1943, § 29-1905.

It was not necessary to analyze this section to dispose of claim that trial court erred in refusing permission to take deposition of inmates of penal institution. Rains v. State, 173 Neb. 586, 114 N.W.2d 399 (1962).